District of Columbia statutes.
4-124

Duties and responsibilities of Board.

The Board of Public Welfare of the District of Columbia [abolished; see now the Department of Human Services] established by § 4-102 [omitted], shall, in addition to the other duties and responsibilities imposed upon it by law, have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1)

To investigate the circumstances affecting children handicapped by dependency, neglect or mental defect, or who may be in danger of becoming delinquent, and to provide such services for the protection and care of such children as will assist in conserving satisfactory home life;

(2)

To safeguard the welfare of children born out of wedlock, by providing services for their mothers and fathers and in caring for and in obtaining support for such children;

(3)

To assume responsibility for the care and support of dependent or neglected children under the age of 18 years needing public care away from their own homes, when such need has been determined by careful investigation and is requested by the parent or parents or any person or agency responsible for the care of such children;

(4)

To make suitable provision for the reception and care of children in need of detention pending court action, or who are temporarily detained under court order, or who are temporarily homeless; and

(5)

Upon proper showing, in its discretion, to discharge from custody or guardianship any child committed to its care.

History

Jan. 12, 1942, 55 Stat. 882, ch. 649, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 6, 23 DCR 2544

Cross References

Age of majority, see § 46-101.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-125.
1973 Ed., § 3-126.

References in Text

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.